Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 3. Dissolving or Moving Religious Associations

§ 1531.
Petition for dissolution.

When five members of a corporation or society created for the support of the gospel and the maintenance of public worship, or to procure, hold, and keep in repair a house of public worship, or a parsonage, or for all or any of such purposes, desire to dissolve or move such corporation or society, they may apply by petition in writing to the Superior Court in the county in which the corporation or society is located.
Such petition, with a citation, shall be served on such corporation or society like a summons.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 1532.
Recognizance.

Before issuing the citation the petitioners shall cause some other person to recognize to such corporation or society in not less than $500.00, to the satisfaction of the clerk of the court, conditioned that the petitioners will prosecute their petition to effect, and answer the damages and costs if judgment is rendered against them.
A minute of the recognizance, with the name of the surety and the sum in which he or she is bound, shall be made upon the citation at the time of signing the same, and signed by the clerk.
If such citation is otherwise issued, on motion it shall abate.

§ 1533.
Opposing petition.

When such petition is brought, members of the corporation or society may appear and defend in the name of such corporation or society, by filing a bond with the clerk in the penal sum of not less than $500.00, conditioned for the payment of the costs which the petitioners may recover against such corporation or society.

§ 1534.
Appointment of commissioners, hearing.

If sufficient cause is shown, the court shall appoint three disinterested persons as commissioners, who shall fix a time and place for hearing, and give reasonable notice thereof to those who defend. If, at the time of giving such notice, a person has not entered to defend, the commissioners shall give notice of such hearing by posting a notice thereof, at least 14 days before such hearing, in three or more public places in the town in which such corporation or society is located.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 11

, § 13.

§ 1535.
Report and judgment.

When, upon such hearing, it appears to be for the best interests of a majority of the members of such corporation or society or the persons interested therein, that the same should be dissolved or moved, and that the property should be divided among the owners thereof, or that such property should be sold and the proceeds divided, the commissioners shall so report to the court within 30 days of their determination of the matter.
The court shall thereupon render judgment in accordance with the facts found, and that such corporation or society is dissolved, and that the property belonging to it, whether real or personal, shall be divided or sold, and its proceeds divided among the owners thereof, or the persons interested therein, as to the court seems just, and for the petitioners to recover their costs, if defense is made to such petition.
If defense is not made, the petitioners shall pay the costs, and the court shall so order.

§ 1536.
Further proceedings.

If no appeal is taken, the court shall issue its order directing the commissioners forthwith to carry out the provisions of such judgment and make return of their doings thereon to the clerk of the court and to the town clerk of the town where such corporation is located, and cause the same to be there recorded.

§ 1537.
Commissioner’s fees; costs.

Each commissioner shall receive $2.00 a day for his or her services and necessary expenses, to be paid by the State as in case of other commissioners appointed by the Superior Court. All other costs incurred shall be taxed as costs are taxed in hearings before a referee in civil causes, and the court shall tax costs as seem just.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.